Connecticut, session 2026, HB05575.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) Notwithstanding any provision
of the general statutes, the Commissioner of Administrative Services
shall convey to the city of Shelton a parcel of land located in the city of
Shelton, at a cost equal to three hundred fifty thousand dollars, plus the
administrative costs of making such conveyance. Said parcel of land has
an area of approximately 6.49 acres, is identified as the parcel of land
located at 784 River Road and is further identified as Lot 38 on city of
Shelton Tax Assessor's Map 12. The conveyance shall be subject to the
approval of the State Properties Review Board.
(b) The state shall retain an easement for purposes of allowing staff
and consultants of the Department of Energy and Environmental
Protection to maintain monitoring wells on said parcel and conduct
post-closure monitoring activities pertaining to the adjacent closed
landfill.
(c) The State Properties Review Board shall complete its review of the
conveyance of said parcel of land not later than thirty days after it
receives a proposed agreement from the Department of Administrative

Substitute House Bill No. 5575
Services. The land shall remain under the care and control of said
department until a conveyance is made in accordance with the
provisions of this section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver
any deed or instrument necessary for a conveyance under this section,
which deed or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the
purposes of subsection (b) of this section. The Commissioner of
Administrative Services shall have the sole responsibility for all other
incidents of such conveyance.
Governor's Action:
Approved June 4, 2026
Special Act No. 26-17 2 of 2